Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 7 Judgment on the Pleadings [Repealed.]

9-7-1 — 9-7-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. ch. 333, § 29, as enacted by P.L. 1929, ch. 1343, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1605, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1893, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 524, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-7-1

— 9-7-5; P.L. 1964, ch. 188, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 17, effective January 10, 1966. For practice concerning motion for judgment on pleadings, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 12(c) and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 12(c). For practice governing summary judgments, see Super. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 56 and Dist. Ct. R. Civ. P. Rule 56.